Illinois, session 104th, HB1744.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 40, par. 203)7    Sec. 203. License to Marry. When a marriage application 8has been completed and signed by both parties to a prospective 9marriage and both parties have appeared before the county 10clerk and the marriage license fee has been paid, the county 11clerk shall issue a license to marry and a marriage 12certificate form upon being furnished:13        (1) satisfactory proof that each party to the marriage 14    has will have attained the age of 18 years at the time the 15    marriage license is effective or will have attained the 16    age of 16 years and has either the consent to the marriage 17    of both parents or his guardian or judicial approval; 18    provided, if one parent cannot be located in order to 19    obtain such consent and diligent efforts have been made to 20    locate that parent by the consenting parent, then the 21    consent of one parent plus a signed affidavit by the 22    consenting parent which (i) names the absent parent and 23    states that he or she cannot be located, and (ii) states   HB1744- 2 -LRB104 03545 JRC 13568 b1    what diligent efforts have been made to locate the absent 2    parent, shall have the effect of both parents' consent for 3    purposes of this Section;4        (2) satisfactory proof that the marriage is not 5    prohibited; and6        (3) an affidavit or record as prescribed in 7    subparagraph (1) of Section 205 or a court order as 8    prescribed in subparagraph (2) of Section 205, if 9    applicable.10    With each marriage license, the county clerk shall provide 11a pamphlet describing the causes and effects of fetal alcohol 12syndrome. At least annually, the county board shall submit to 13the Illinois Department of Public Health a report as to the 14county clerk's compliance with the requirement that the county 15clerk provide a pamphlet with each marriage license. All 16funding and production costs for the aforementioned 17educational pamphlets for distribution to each county clerk 18shall be provided by non-profit, non-sectarian statewide 19programs that provide education, advocacy, support, and 20prevention services pertaining to Fetal Alcohol Syndrome. 21(Source: P.A. 96-1323, eff. 1-1-11.) 22    Section 10. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 23Marriage Act is amended by changing Sections 301 and 302 as 24follows:   HB1744- 3 -LRB104 03545 JRC 13568 b1    (750 ILCS 5/301)  (from Ch. 40, par. 301)2    Sec. 301. Declaration of invalidity; grounds. Invalidity - 3Grounds.) The court shall enter its judgment declaring the 4invalidity of a marriage (formerly known as annulment) entered 5into under the following circumstances:6        (1) a party lacked capacity to consent to the marriage 7    at the time the marriage was solemnized, either because of 8    mental incapacity or infirmity or because of the influence 9    of alcohol, drugs or other incapacitating substances, or a 10    party was induced to enter into a marriage by force or 11    duress or by fraud involving the essentials of marriage;12        (2) a party lacks the physical capacity to consummate 13    the marriage by sexual intercourse and at the time the 14    marriage was solemnized the other party did not know of 15    the incapacity;16        (3) (blank) a party was aged 16 or 17 years and did not 17    have the consent of his parents or guardian or judicial 18    approval; or19        (4) the marriage is prohibited.20(Source: P.A. 80-923.) 21    (750 ILCS 5/302)  (from Ch. 40, par. 302)22    Sec. 302. Time of Commencement.) 23    (a) A declaration of invalidity under paragraph paragraphs 24(1) or (2) through (3) of Section 301 may be sought by any of 25the following persons and must be commenced within the times   HB1744- 4 -LRB104 03545 JRC 13568 b1specified:2        (1) for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (1) 3    of Section 301, by either party or by the legal 4    representative of the party who lacked capacity to 5    consent, no later than 90 days after the petitioner 6    obtained knowledge of the described condition;7        (2) for the reason set forth in paragraph (2) of 8    Section 301, by either party, no later than one year after 9    the petitioner obtained knowledge of the described 10    condition;11        (3) (blank) for the reason set forth in paragraph (3) 12    of Section 301, by the underaged party, his parent or 13    guardian, prior to the time the underaged party reaches 14    the age at which he could have married without needing to 15    satisfy the omitted requirement.16    (b) In no event may a declaration of invalidity of 17marriage be sought after the death of either party to the 18marriage under paragraph subsections (1) or , (2) and (3) of 19Section 301.20    (c) A declaration of invalidity for the reason set forth 21in paragraph (4) of Section 301 may be sought by either party, 22the legal spouse in case of a bigamous marriage, the State's 23Attorney or a child of either party, at any time not to exceed 243 years following the death of the first party to die.25(Source: P.A. 80-923.)   HB1744- 5 -LRB104 03545 JRC 13568 b1    (750 ILCS 5/208 rep.)2    Section 15. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 3Marriage Act is amended by repealing Section 208. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law, except that Section 10 takes effect 2 years 6after this Act becomes law.